Nevada, session 83, SB353.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. On or before October 1, 2025, the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and
Human Services shall, to the extent that federal participation is
available:
(a) Amend the Medicaid Services Manual to create a specific
billing category for clinics operated by an accredited university
within this State or pursuant to a faculty practice plan to which such
a university is a party under the direction of a physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS that:
(1) Provide mental or behavioral health care to persons
enrolled in Medicaid; and
(2) Provide education and training to trainees completing a
degree, supervised clinical hours or other requirements necessary for
the issuance of a registration, certificate or license, as applicable, as
a mental or behavioral health professional;
(b) Establish an all-inclusive per diem rate of reimbursement
under Medicaid for services provided by a trainee, other than a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
trainee seeking a license to practice medicine as a psychiatrist or a
license to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse who
provides psychiatric services, at a clinic described in paragraph (a);
and
(c) Establish an all-inclusive per diem rate of reimbursement
under Medicaid for services provided by a trainee seeking a license
to practice medicine as a psychiatrist or a license to practice as an
advanced practice registered nurse who provides psychiatric
services, at a clinic described in paragraph (a).
2. The per diem rates of reimbursement provided pursuant to
paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1 must be provided for services
provided:
(a) At a clinic described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1;
(b) Through a mobile clinic owned or operated by a clinic
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1;
(c) Outside a clinic described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 to
recipients of Medicaid who do not reside in a permanent dwelling or
do not have a fixed mailing address; or
(d) By a clinic described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1
through telehealth, as defined in NRS 629.515.
3. The Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law, apply for any amendment of the State
Plan for Medicaid or request any other federal authority that is
necessary to carry out the requirements of this section.
(b) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirements of the
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver, amendment or other
federal authority pursuant to paragraph (a).
4. Any application submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 must be supported using methods for determining
reimbursement rates accepted by the Secretary.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Faculty practice plan” means an agreement with an
institution of higher education which provides for the continued
practice of and the performance of research and education by a
faculty member of the institution of higher education.
(b) “Mental or behavioral health professional” means a person
who is:
(1) Licensed, certified or registered pursuant to chapter 641,
641A, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(2) Licensed as a physician, physician assistant or advanced
practice registered nurse who practices in psychiatry, addiction
medicine or another specialty relating to behavioral health.
(c) “Trainee” means a person seeking licensure, certification or
registration as a mental or behavioral health professional who is
engaging in supervised practice required to obtain such licensure,
certification or registration. The term includes, without limitation:
(1) A student enrolled in an accredited mental or behavioral
health program to obtain a graduate degree who is participating in a
supervised practicum or internship; and
(2) A person who has completed the academic requirements
for licensure, certification or registration and is obtaining hours of
supervised practice required by law or regulation for licensure,
certification or registration.
Sec. 1.5. 1. The Division of Health Care Financing and
Policy of the Department of Health and Human Services shall
transfer the following sums from the Account to Improve Health
Care Quality and Access created by NRS 422.37945 to the Nevada
Medicaid budget account to carry out the provisions of section 1 of
this act:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $116,672
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $138,481
2. Expenditure of the following sums not appropriated from the
State General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
by the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the
Department of Health and Human Services for the same purposes as
set forth in subsection 1:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $211,213
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $206,127
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)